Louisiana, session 2026, HB1218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 1090 from its intersection with United
States Highway 190 to its intersection with Interstate 10 in Slidell, Louisiana, shall be known
and is hereby designated as the "Louis 'Pat' Miramon Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting these designations
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1